Connecticut, session 2026, SB00209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 17b of the general statutes be amended to require the
Commissioner of Social Services to (1) amend the Medicaid state plan to
increase rates of reimbursement for nephrology services to not less than
eighty per cent of Medicare rates for the same types of services, and (2)
file a report on the impact of the rate increases on provider participation
in the Medicaid program, access to care and the state budget.